Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB509.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 706(a)(5) of the act of July 10, 1987 (P.L.246, No.47), known as the Municipalities Financial Recovery Act, is amended to read:Section 706. Powers, duties and prohibited actions.(a) Powers and duties.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the receiver shall have the following powers and duties:* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (5) To require the distressed municipality or authority to cause the sale, lease, conveyance, assignment or other use or disposition of the distressed municipality's or authority's assets in accordance with section 707[.], provided that the distressed municipality and receiver obtain approval from 75% of the governing bodies of municipalities which have service agreements with or whose residents previously received water or sewer services, or both, from the distressed municipality or authority prior to the sale, lease, conveyance, assignment or other use or disposition of the distressed municipality's or authority's assets. Municipal approval shall be as follows:(i) T he approval must be in the form of a resolution.(ii) The resolution must be adopted at a public meeting by an affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the governing body of the municipality.(iii) The result of an affirmative vote must be transmitted to the distressed municipality and receiver within 48 hours of the vote.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0509PN0491 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122